Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2025 c 220 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:Â TABLE 2Â Â CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVELÂ XVIAggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)Â XVHomicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)Â Â Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))Â Â Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)Â XIVMurder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)Â Â Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))Â XIIIMalicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))Â Â Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))Â XIIAssault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)Â Â Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)Â Â Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))Â Â Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)Â Â Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)Â Â Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)Â Â Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(3))Â XIManslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)Â Â Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)Â Â Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)Â Â Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)Â Â Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)Â XChild Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)Â Â Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)Â Â Indecent Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))Â Â Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)Â Â Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))Â Â Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))Â Â Sexually Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)Â IXAbandonment of Dependent Person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)Â Â Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)Â Â Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)Â Â Hit and RunâDeath (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))Â Â Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 79A.60.050)Â Â Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))Â Â Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))Â Â Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)Â Â Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)Â VIIIArson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)Â Â Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.100)Â Â Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW 79A.60.050)Â Â Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)Â Â Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)Â Â Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)Â VIIAir bag diagnostic systems (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.660(2)(b))Â Â Air bag replacement requirements (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.660(1)(b))Â Â Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)Â Â Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)Â Â Civil Disorder Training (RCW 9A.48.120)Â Â Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)Â Â Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.050(1))Â Â Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)Â Â False Reporting 1 (RCW 9A.84.040(2)(a))Â Â Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)Â Â Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))Â Â Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)Â Â Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))Â Â Manufacture or import counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed air bag (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.650(1)(b))Â Â Negligently Causing Death By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.675)Â Â Sell, install, or reinstall counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed airbag (RCW 46.37.650(2)(b))Â Â Sending, bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.060(1))Â Â Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))Â Â Use of a Machine Gun or Bump-fire Stock in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)Â Â Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)Â VIBail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))Â Â Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)Â Â Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))Â Â Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)Â Â Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)Â Â Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))Â Â Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.070(1))Â Â Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)Â Â Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)Â Â Theft from a Vulnerable Adult 1 (RCW 9A.56.400(1))Â Â Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)Â VAbandonment of Dependent Person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)Â Â Advancing money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)Â Â Air bag diagnostic systems (RCW 46.37.660(2)(c))Â Â Air bag replacement requirements (RCW 46.37.660(1)(c))Â Â Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))Â Â Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)Â Â Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)Â Â Custodial Sexual Misconduct 2 (RCW 9A.44.170)Â Â Dealing in Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.050(2))Â Â Domestic Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 7.105.450, 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.26B.050, or 26.52.070)Â Â Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)Â Â Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)Â Â Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)Â Â Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))Â Â Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)Â Â Manufacture or import counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed air bag (RCW 46.37.650(1)(c))Â Â Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)Â Â Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)Â Â Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)Â Â Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)Â Â Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)Â Â Sell, install, or reinstall counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed airbag (RCW 46.37.650(2)(c))Â Â Sending, Bringing into State Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.060(2))Â Â Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)Â Â Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)Â Â Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)Â Â Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)Â IVAnimal Fighting (with intentional mutilation) (RCW 16.52.117(2)(b))Â Â Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)Â Â Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)Â Â Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031(1)(h))Â Â Assault 4 (third domestic violence offense) (RCW 9A.36.041(3))Â Â Assault by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)Â Â Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)Â Â Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)Â Â Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)Â Â Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))Â Â Driving While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.502(6))Â Â Endangerment with a Controlled Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)Â Â Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)Â Â Hate Crime (RCW 9A.36.080)Â Â Hit and RunâInjury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))Â Â Hit and Run with VesselâInjury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))Â Â Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))Â Â Indecent Exposure to Person Under Age 14 (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)Â Â Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)Â Â Physical Control of a Vehicle While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.504(6))Â Â Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.070(2))Â Â Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)Â Â Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)Â Â Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)Â Â Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)Â Â Trafficking in Catalytic Converters 1 (RCW 9A.82.190)Â Â Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.82.050)Â Â Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(b))Â Â Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health care service contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))Â Â Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health maintenance organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))Â Â Unlawful transaction of insurance business (RCW 48.15.023(3))Â Â Unlicensed practice as an insurance professional (RCW 48.17.063(2))Â Â Use of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))Â Â Vehicle Prowling 2 (third or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.52.100(3))Â Â Vehicular Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)Â Â Viewing of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.075(1))Â IIIAnimal Cruelty 1 (RCW 16.52.205)Â Â Animal Fighting (without intentional mutilation) (RCW 16.52.117(2)(a))Â Â Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace Officer With a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except subsection (1)(h))Â Â Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)Â Â Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))Â Â Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)Â Â Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)Â Â Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)Â Â Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)Â Â Cyber Harassment (RCW 9A.90.120(2)(b))Â Â Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)Â Â Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)Â Â False Reporting 2 (RCW 9A.84.040(2)(b))Â Â Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)Â Â Hazing (RCW 28B.10.901(2)(b))Â Â Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)Â Â Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)Â Â Malicious Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)Â Â Manufacture of Untraceable Firearm with Intent to Sell (RCW 9.41.190)Â Â Manufacture or Assembly of an Undetectable Firearm or Untraceable Firearm (RCW 9.41.325)Â Â Mortgage Fraud (RCW 19.144.080)Â Â Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily Harm By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.674)Â Â Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.350(2))Â Â Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)Â Â Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)Â Â Possession of Machine Gun, Bump-Fire Stock, Undetectable Firearm, or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)Â Â Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)Â Â Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 1 (RCW 9A.56.360(2))Â Â Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)Â Â Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)Â Â Telephone Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230(2))Â Â Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)Â Â Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW 9A.56.340(2))Â Â Trafficking in Catalytic Converters 2 (RCW 9A.82.200)Â Â Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.82.055)Â Â Unlawful Hunting of Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.410(3)(b))Â Â Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)Â Â Unlawful Misbranding of Fish or Shellfish 1 (RCW 77.140.060(3))Â Â Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))Â Â Unlawful Taking of Endangered Fish or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.120(3)(b))Â Â Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(b))Â Â Unlawful Use of a Nondesignated Vessel (RCW 77.15.530(4))Â Â Vehicular Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.522)Â IICommercial Fishing Without a License 1 (RCW 77.15.500(3)(b))Â Â Computer Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.90.040)Â Â Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))Â Â Electronic Data Service Interference (RCW 9A.90.060)Â Â Electronic Data Tampering 1 (RCW 9A.90.080)Â Â Electronic Data Theft (RCW 9A.90.100)Â Â Engaging in Fish Dealing Activity Unlicensed 1 (RCW 77.15.620(3))Â Â Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)Â Â ((Failure to Register as a Sex Offender (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.44.130 prior to June 10, 2010, and RCW 9A.44.132)))Â Â Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)Â Â Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))Â Â Improperly Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)Â Â Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)Â Â Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.350(3))Â Â Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)Â Â Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068)Â Â Possession, sale, or offering for sale of seven or more unmarked catalytic converters (RCW 9A.82.180(5))Â Â Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 2 (RCW 9A.56.360(3))Â Â Scrap Processing, Recycling, or Supplying Without a License (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 19.290.100)Â Â Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)Â Â Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065)Â Â Theft of Rental, Leased, Lease-purchased, or Loaned Property (valued at $5,000 or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))Â Â Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW 9A.56.340(3))Â Â Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)Â Â Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(a))Â Â Unlawful Participation of Non-Indians in Indian Fishery (RCW 77.15.570(2))Â Â Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)Â Â Unlawful Purchase or Use of a License (RCW 77.15.650(3)(b))Â Â Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 2 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(a))Â Â Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))Â Â Voyeurism 1 (RCW 9A.44.115)Â IAttempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)Â Â Failure to Register as a Sex Offender (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.44.130 prior to June 10, 2010, and RCW 9A.44.132)Â Â False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)Â Â Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)Â Â Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a Mental Health Advance Directive (RCW 9A.60.060)Â Â Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)Â Â Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)Â Â Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)Â Â Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)Â Â Spotlighting Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.450(3)(b))Â Â Suspension of Department Privileges 1 (RCW 77.15.670(3)(b))Â Â Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)Â Â Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)Â Â Theft from a Vulnerable Adult 2 (RCW 9A.56.400(2))Â Â Theft of Rental, Leased, Lease-purchased, or Loaned Property (valued at $750 or more but less than $5,000) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(b))Â Â Transaction of insurance business beyond the scope of licensure (RCW 48.17.063)Â Â Unlawful Fish and Shellfish Catch Accounting (RCW 77.15.630(3)(b))Â Â Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)Â Â Unlawful Possession of Fictitious Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)Â Â Unlawful Possession of Instruments of Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)Â Â Unlawful Possession of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)Â Â Unlawful Possession of a Personal Identification Device (RCW 9A.56.320)Â Â Unlawful Production of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)Â Â Unlawful Releasing, Planting, Possessing, or Placing Deleterious Exotic Wildlife (RCW 77.15.250(2)(b))Â Â Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.142)Â Â Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.144)Â Â Unlawful Use of Net to Take Fish 1 (RCW 77.15.580(3)(b))Â Â Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)Â Â Violating Commercial Fishing Area or Time 1 (RCW 77.15.550(3)(b))Â Sec. 2. RCW 9A.44.132 and 2023 c 150 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person commits the crime of failure to register as a sex offender if the person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 for a felony sex offense and knowingly fails to comply with any of the requirements of RCW 9A.44.130.(a) The failure to register as a sex offender pursuant to this subsection is a class C felony if the person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130(1)(a) ((and:(i) It is the person's first conviction for a felony failure to register; or(ii) The person has previously been convicted of a felony failure to register as a sex offender in this state or pursuant to the laws of another state, or pursuant to federal law.(b) If a person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130(1)(a) and has been convicted of a felony failure to register as a sex offender in this state or pursuant to the laws of another state, or pursuant to federal law, on two or more prior occasions, the failure to register under this subsection is a class B felony)).(((c)))(b) The failure to register as a sex offender is a gross misdemeanor if the person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130(1)(b).(2) A person is guilty of failure to register as a sex offender if the person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 for a sex offense other than a felony and knowingly fails to comply with any of the requirements of RCW 9A.44.130. The failure to register as a sex offender under this subsection is a gross misdemeanor.(3) A person commits the crime of failure to register as a kidnapping offender if the person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 for a kidnapping offense and knowingly fails to comply with any of the requirements of RCW 9A.44.130.(a) If the person has a duty to register for a felony kidnapping offense, the failure to register as a kidnapping offender is a class C felony.(b) If the person has a duty to register for a kidnapping offense other than a felony, the failure to register as a kidnapping offender is a gross misdemeanor.(4) Unless relieved of the duty to register pursuant to RCW 9A.44.141 and 9A.44.142, a violation of this section is an ongoing offense for purposes of the statute of limitations under RCW 9A.04.080.Sec. 3. RCW 9.94A.030 and 2025 c 407 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created under chapter 9.95 RCW.(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department, means that the department, either directly or through a collection agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence conditions.(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed as part of a sentence under this chapter and served in the community subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and activities by the department.(6) "Community protection zone" means the area within 880 feet of the facilities and grounds of a public or private school.(7) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the offender.(8) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.(9) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Title 10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of a plea of guilty.(10) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.(11) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or elsewhere, and any issued certificates of restoration of opportunity pursuant to RCW 9.97.020.(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i) whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of incarceration.(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated pursuant to a governor's pardon. However, when a defendant is charged with a recidivist offense, "criminal history" includes a vacated prior conviction for the sole purpose of establishing that such vacated prior conviction constitutes an element of the present recidivist offense as provided in RCW 9.94A.640(4)(b) and 9.96.060(8)(c).(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's criminal history.(12) "Criminal street gang" means any ongoing organization, association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal or informal, having a common name or common identifying sign or symbol, having as one of its primary activities the commission of criminal acts, and whose members or associates individually or collectively engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal street gang activity. This definition does not apply to employees engaged in concerted activities for their mutual aid and protection, or to the activities of labor and bona fide nonprofit organizations or their members or agents.(13) "Criminal street gang associate or member" means any person who actively participates in any criminal street gang and who intentionally promotes, furthers, or assists in any criminal act by the criminal street gang.(14) "Criminal street gang-related offense" means any felony or misdemeanor offense, whether in this state or elsewhere, that is committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association with any criminal street gang, or is committed with the intent to promote, further, or assist in any criminal conduct by the gang, or is committed for one or more of the following reasons:(a) To gain admission, prestige, or promotion within the gang;(b) To increase or maintain the gang's size, membership, prestige, dominance, or control in any geographical area;(c) To exact revenge or retribution for the gang or any member of the gang;(d) To obstruct justice, or intimidate or eliminate any witness against the gang or any member of the gang;(e) To directly or indirectly cause any benefit, aggrandizement, gain, profit, or other advantage for the gang, its reputation, influence, or membership; or(f) To provide the gang with any advantage in, or any control or dominance over any criminal market sector, including, but not limited to, manufacturing, delivering, or selling any controlled substance (chapter 69.50 RCW); arson (chapter 9A.48 RCW); trafficking in stolen property (chapter 9A.82 RCW); promoting prostitution (chapter 9A.88 RCW); human trafficking (RCW 9A.40.100); promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor (RCW 9.68A.101); or promoting pornography (chapter 9.68 RCW).(15) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any dependents.(16) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with sentence conditions, and in which the offender is required to report daily to a specific location designated by the department or the sentencing court.(17) "Department" means the department of corrections.(18) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial confinement, of community custody, the number of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate sentence.(19) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050, or Title 74 RCW.(20)(a) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 10.99.020.(b) "Domestic violence" also means: (i) Physical harm, bodily injury, assault, or the infliction of fear of imminent physical harm, bodily injury, or assault, sexual assault, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110, of one intimate partner by another intimate partner as defined in RCW 10.99.020; or (ii) physical harm, bodily injury, assault, or the infliction of fear of imminent physical harm, bodily injury, or assault, sexual assault, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110, of one family or household member by another family or household member as defined in RCW 10.99.020.(21) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option available to persons convicted of a felony offense who are eligible for the option under RCW 9.94A.660.(22) "Drug offender sentencing alternative for driving under the influence" is a sentencing option available to persons convicted of felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW 46.61.502(6), or felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW 46.61.504(6) who are eligible under RCW 9.94A.661.(23) "Drug offense" means:(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a controlled substance; or(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.(24) "Earned release" means earned release from confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728.(25) "Electronic monitoring" means tracking the location of an individual through the use of technology that is capable of determining or identifying the monitored individual's presence or absence at a particular location including, but not limited to:(a) Radio frequency signaling technology, which detects if the monitored individual is or is not at an approved location and notifies the monitoring agency of the time that the monitored individual either leaves the approved location or tampers with or removes the monitoring device; or(b) Active or passive global positioning system technology, which detects the location of the monitored individual and notifies the monitoring agency of the monitored individual's location and which may also include electronic monitoring with victim notification technology that is capable of notifying a victim or protected party, either directly or through a monitoring agency, if the monitored individual enters within the restricted distance of a victim or protected party, or within the restricted distance of a designated location.(26) "Escape" means:(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW 9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful failure to be available for supervision by the department while in community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this subsection.(27) "Felony traffic offense" means:(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)), felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), or felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)); or(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.(28) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specific period of time.(29) "First-time offender" means any person who has no prior convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.(30) "Home detention" is a subset of electronic monitoring and means a program of partial confinement available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private residence 24 hours a day, unless an absence from the residence is approved, authorized, or otherwise permitted in the order by the court or other supervising agency that ordered home detention, and the offender is subject to electronic monitoring.(31) "Homelessness" or "homeless" means a condition where an individual lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence and who has a primary nighttime residence that is:(a) A supervised, publicly or privately operated shelter designed to provide temporary living accommodations;(b) A public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings; or(c) A private residence where the individual stays as a transient invitee.(32) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal financial obligations which may include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense, fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense of an emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.(33) "Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;(b) Assault in the second degree;(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;(d) Child molestation in the second degree;(e) Controlled substance homicide;(f) Extortion in the first degree;(g) Incest when committed against a child under age 14;(h) Indecent liberties;(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;(j) Leading organized crime;(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;(n) Rape in the third degree;(o) Sexual exploitation;(p) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner;(q) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;(r) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation;(s) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.825;(t) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;(u)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of 14; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997, or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993, through July 27, 1997;(v) Any out-of-state conviction for a felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation if the minimum sentence imposed was 10 years or more; provided that the out-of-state felony offense must be comparable to a felony offense under this title and Title 9A RCW and the out-of-state definition of sexual motivation must be comparable to the definition of sexual motivation contained in this section.(34) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.(35) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by state law and is 18 years of age or older or is less than 18 years of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. In addition, for the purpose of community custody requirements under this chapter, "offender" also means a misdemeanant or gross misdemeanant probationer ordered by a superior court to probation pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210 and supervised by the department pursuant to RCW 9.94A.501 and 9.94A.5011. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and "defendant" are used interchangeably.(36) "Partial confinement" means confinement up to 18 months in a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home detention, electronic monitoring, or work crew has been ordered by the court or home detention has been ordered by the department as part of the parenting program or the graduated reentry program, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the balance of the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work release, home detention, work crew, electronic monitoring, and a combination of work crew, electronic monitoring, and home detention.(37) "Pattern of criminal street gang activity" means:(a) The commission, attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation of, or any prior juvenile adjudication of or adult conviction of, two or more of the following criminal street gang-related offenses:(i) Any "serious violent" felony offense as defined in this section, excluding Homicide by Abuse (RCW 9A.32.055) and Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120);(ii) Any "violent" offense as defined by this section, excluding Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130);(iii) Deliver or Possession with Intent to Deliver a Controlled Substance (chapter 69.50 RCW);(iv) Any violation of the firearms and dangerous weapon act (chapter 9.41 RCW);(v) Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300);(vi) Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310);(vii) Hate Crime (RCW 9A.36.080);(viii) Harassment where a subsequent violation or deadly threat is made (RCW 9A.46.020(2)(b));(ix) Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120);(x) Any felony conviction by a person 18 years of age or older with a special finding of involving a juvenile in a felony offense under RCW 9.94A.833;(xi) Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025);(xii) Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030);(xiii) Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070);(xiv) Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080);(xv) Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065);(xvi) Possession of a Stolen Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068);(xvii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070);(xviii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075);(xix) Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120);(xx) Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130);(xxi) Intimidating a Witness (RCW 9A.72.110);(xxii) Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120);(xxiii) Reckless Endangerment (RCW 9A.36.050);(xxiv) Coercion (RCW 9A.36.070);(xxv) Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020); or(xxvi) Malicious Mischief 3 (RCW 9A.48.090);(b) That at least one of the offenses listed in (a) of this subsection shall have occurred after July 1, 2008;(c) That the most recent committed offense listed in (a) of this subsection occurred within three years of a prior offense listed in (a) of this subsection; and(d) Of the offenses that were committed in (a) of this subsection, the offenses occurred on separate occasions or were committed by two or more persons.(38) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious offense; and(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first degree, assault of a child in the second degree, or burglary in the first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this subsection (38)(b)(i); and(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender was 16 years of age or older when the offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender was 18 years of age or older when the offender committed the offense.(39) "Predatory" means: (a) The perpetrator of the crime was a stranger to the victim, as defined in this section; (b) the perpetrator established or promoted a relationship with the victim prior to the offense and the victimization of the victim was a significant reason the perpetrator established or promoted the relationship; or (c) the perpetrator was: (i) A teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person in authority in any public or private school and the victim was a student of the school under his or her authority or supervision. For purposes of this subsection, "school" does not include home-based instruction as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; (ii) a coach, trainer, volunteer, or other person in authority in any recreational activity and the victim was a participant in the activity under his or her authority or supervision; (iii) a pastor, elder, volunteer, or other person in authority in any church or religious organization, and the victim was a member or participant of the organization under his or her authority; or (iv) a teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person in authority providing home-based instruction and the victim was a student receiving home-based instruction while under his or her authority or supervision. For purposes of this subsection: (A) "Home-based instruction" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; and (B) "teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person in authority" does not include the parent or legal guardian of the victim.(40) "Private school" means a school regulated under chapter 28A.195 or 28A.205 RCW.(41) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.010.(42) "Recidivist offense" means a felony offense where a prior conviction of the same offense or other specified offense is an element of the crime including, but not limited to:(a) Assault in the fourth degree where domestic violence is pleaded and proven, RCW 9A.36.041(3);(b) Cyber harassment, RCW 9A.90.120(2)(b)(i);(c) Harassment, RCW 9A.46.020(2)(b)(i);(d) Indecent exposure, RCW 9A.88.010(2)(c);(e) Stalking, RCW 9A.46.110(5)(b) (i) and (iii);(f) Telephone harassment, RCW 9.61.230(2)(a); and(g) Violation of a no-contact or protection order, RCW 7.105.450 or former RCW 26.50.110(5).(43) "Repetitive domestic violence offense" means any:(a)(i) Domestic violence assault that is not a felony offense under RCW 9A.36.041;(ii) Domestic violence violation of a no-contact order under chapter 10.99 RCW that is not a felony offense;(iii) Domestic violence violation of a protection order under chapter 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW or former chapter 26.50 RCW, or violation of a domestic violence protection order under chapter 7.105 RCW, that is not a felony offense;(iv) Domestic violence harassment offense under RCW 9A.46.020 that is not a felony offense; or(v) Domestic violence stalking offense under RCW 9A.46.110 that is not a felony offense; or(b) Any federal, out-of-state, tribal court, military, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a repetitive domestic violence offense under (a) of this subsection.(44) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include both public and private costs.(45) "Risk assessment" means the application of the risk instrument recommended to the department by the Washington state institute for public policy as having the highest degree of predictive accuracy for assessing an offender's risk of reoffense.(46)(a) "Serious traffic offense" means:(((a)))(i)(A) Nonfelony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502);(((ii)))(B) Nonfelony actual physical control while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504);(((iii)))(C) Reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500);(((iv)))(D) Negligent driving if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522 while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.5249);(((v)))(E) Reckless endangerment if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522 while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 9A.36.050); or(((vi)))(F) Hit-and-run an attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or(((b)))(ii) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense under (a)(i) of this subsection.(((c)))(b) This definition applies for the purpose of a personal driver's license only and does not apply to violations related to a commercial motor vehicle under RCW 46.25.090.(47) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and means:(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;(ii) Homicide by abuse;(iii) Murder in the second degree;(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;(v) Assault in the first degree;(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;(vii) Rape in the first degree;(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of these felonies; or(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a) of this subsection.(48) "Sex offense" means:(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than RCW 9A.44.132;(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than RCW 9.68A.080; or(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes((; or(v) A felony violation of RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register as a sex offender) if the person has been convicted of violating RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register as a sex offender) or 9A.44.130 prior to June 10, 2010, on at least one prior occasion));(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex offense in (a) of this subsection;(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this subsection.(49) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual gratification.(50) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.(51) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.(52) "Stranger" means that the victim did not know the offender 24 hours before the offense.(53) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any other unit of government for 24 hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.(54) "Transition training" means written and verbal instructions and assistance provided by the department to the offender during the two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of the work ethic camp program. The transition training shall include instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations during the offender's period of community custody.(55) "Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the crime charged.(56) "Victim of domestic violence" means an intimate partner or household member who has been subjected to the infliction of physical harm or sexual and psychological abuse by an intimate partner or household member as part of a pattern of assaultive, coercive, and controlling behaviors directed at achieving compliance from or control over that intimate partner or household member. Domestic violence includes, but is not limited to, the offenses listed in RCW 10.99.020 and 26.50.010 committed by an intimate partner or household member against a victim who is an intimate partner or household member.(57) "Victim of sex trafficking, prostitution, or commercial sexual abuse of a minor" means a person who has been forced or coerced to perform a commercial sex act including, but not limited to, being a victim of offenses defined in RCW 9A.40.100, 9A.88.070, 9.68A.101, and the trafficking victims protection act of 2000, 22 U.S.C. Sec. 7101 et seq.; or a person who was induced to perform a commercial sex act when they were less than 18 years of age including but not limited to the offenses defined in chapter 9.68A RCW.(58) "Victim of sexual assault" means any person who is a victim of a sexual assault offense, nonconsensual sexual conduct, or nonconsensual sexual penetration and as a result suffers physical, emotional, financial, or psychological impacts. Sexual assault offenses include, but are not limited to, the offenses defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.(59) "Violent offense" means:(a) Any of the following felonies:(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony;(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;(vii) Arson in the second degree;(viii) Assault in the second degree;(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;(x) Extortion in the first degree;(xi) Robbery in the second degree;(xii) Drive-by shooting;(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner; and(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of this subsection; and(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.(60) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that complies with RCW 9.94A.725.(61) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences, character-building work ethics training, life management skills development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy training, and basic adult education.(62) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study at school.Sec. 4. RCW 9.94A.701 and 2024 c 306 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If an offender is sentenced to the custody of the department for one of the following crimes, the court shall, in addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody for three years:(a) A sex offense not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507; or(b) A serious violent offense.(2) A court shall, in addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence an offender to community custody for two years when the court sentences the person to the custody of the department for a second or subsequent violation of RCW 9A.44.132(1).(3) A court shall, in addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence an offender to community custody for 18 months when the court sentences the person to the custody of the department for a violent offense that is not considered a serious violent offense.(((3)))(4) A court shall, in addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence an offender to community custody for one year when the court sentences the person to the custody of the department for:(a) Any crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2);(b) An offense involving the unlawful possession of a firearm under RCW 9.41.040, where the offender is a criminal street gang member or associate;(c) A felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on or after July 1, 2000; or(d) A felony violation of RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register) that is the offender's first violation for a felony failure to register.(((4)))(5) If an offender is sentenced under the drug offender sentencing alternative, the court shall impose community custody as provided in:(a) RCW 9.94A.660 and 9.94A.662 for a prison-based drug offender sentencing alternative;(b) RCW 9.94A.660 and 9.94A.664 for a residential-based drug offender sentencing alternative;(c) RCW 9.94A.662 and 9.94A.661(6) for a prison-based drug offender sentencing alternative for driving under the influence; and(d) RCW 9.94A.661 (5) and (6) for a residential-based drug offender sentencing alternative for driving under the influence.(((5)))(6) If an offender is sentenced under the special sex offender sentencing alternative, the court shall impose community custody as provided in RCW 9.94A.670.(((6)))(7) If an offender is sentenced to a work ethic camp, the court shall impose community custody as provided in RCW 9.94A.690.(((7)))(8) If an offender is sentenced under the parenting sentencing alternative, the court shall impose a term of community custody as provided in RCW 9.94A.655.(((8)))(9) If the offender is sentenced under the mental health sentencing alternative, the court shall impose a term of community custody as provided in RCW 9.94A.695.(((9)))(10) If a sex offender is sentenced as a nonpersistent offender pursuant to RCW 9.94A.507, the court shall impose community custody as provided in that section.(((10)))(11) The term of community custody specified by this section shall be reduced by the court whenever an offender's standard sentence range term of confinement in combination with the term of community custody exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as provided in RCW 9A.20.021.Sec. 5. RCW 9.94A.702 and 2010 c 267 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If an offender is sentenced to a term of confinement for one year or less for one of the following offenses, the court may impose up to one year of community custody:(a) A sex offense;(b) A violent offense;(c) A crime against a person under RCW 9.94A.411; (d) A felony violation of chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, or an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit such a crime; or(e) A ((felony))first violation of RCW 9A.44.132 (1), (2), or (3) (failure to register).(2) If an offender is sentenced to a first-time offender waiver, the court may impose community custody as provided in RCW 9.94A.650.(3) For a second or subsequent violation of RCW 9A.44.132 (1), (2), or (3), the court shall impose two years of community custody.Sec. 6. RCW 9.94A.501 and 2025 c 371 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall supervise the following individuals who are sentenced to probation in superior court, pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210:(a) Individuals convicted of:(i) Sexual misconduct with a minor second degree;(ii) Custodial sexual misconduct second degree;(iii) Communication with a minor for immoral purposes; and(iv) Violation of RCW 9A.44.132(2) (failure to register); and(b) Individuals who have:(i) A current conviction for a repetitive domestic violence offense after August 1, 2011; and(ii) A prior conviction for a repetitive domestic violence offense or domestic violence felony offense after August 1, 2011.(2) Individuals convicted of misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor offenses supervised by the department pursuant to this section shall be placed on community custody.(3) The department shall supervise every individual convicted of a felony and sentenced to community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701 or 9.94A.702 whose risk assessment classifies the individual as one who is at a high risk to reoffend.(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the department shall supervise an individual sentenced to community custody regardless of risk classification if the individual:(a) Has a current conviction for a sex offense or a serious violent offense and was sentenced to a term of community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701, 9.94A.702, or 9.94A.507;(b) Has been identified by the department as a dangerous mentally ill offender pursuant to RCW 72.09.370;(c) Has an indeterminate sentence and is subject to parole pursuant to RCW 9.95.017;(d) Has a current conviction for violating RCW 9A.44.132 (1), (2), or (3) (failure to register) and was sentenced to a term of community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701 or 9.94A.702;(e)(i) Has a current conviction for a domestic violence felony offense after August 1, 2011, and a prior conviction for a repetitive domestic violence offense or domestic violence felony offense after August 1, 2011. This subsection (4)(e)(i) applies only to offenses committed prior to July 24, 2015;(ii) Has a current conviction for a domestic violence felony offense. The state and its officers, agents, and employees shall not be held criminally or civilly liable for its supervision of an individual under this subsection (4)(e)(ii) unless the state and its officers, agents, and employees acted with gross negligence;(f) Was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.650, 9.94A.655, 9.94A.660, 9.94A.670, 9.94A.711, 9.94A.695, or 9.94A.661;(g) Is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745; or(h) Was convicted and sentenced under RCW 46.61.520 (vehicular homicide), RCW 46.61.522 (vehicular assault), RCW 46.61.502(6) (felony DUI), or RCW 46.61.504(6) (felony physical control).(5) The department shall supervise any individual released by the indeterminate sentence review board who was sentenced to community custody or subject to community custody under the terms of release.(6) The department shall supervise any individual granted conditional commutation pursuant to RCW 9.94A.885.(7) The department is not authorized to, and may not, supervise any individual sentenced to a term of community custody or any probationer unless the individual or probationer is one for whom supervision is required under this section.(8) The department shall conduct a risk assessment for every individual convicted of a felony and sentenced to a term of community custody who may be subject to supervision under this section.(9) The period of time the department is authorized to supervise an individual under this section may not exceed the duration of community custody specified under RCW 9.94B.050, 9.94A.701 (1) through (((9)))(10), or 9.94A.702, except in cases where the court has imposed an exceptional term of community custody under RCW 9.94A.535 and where the governor imposes a term of community custody as a condition of conditional commutation or imposes an additional term of community custody due to a violation of conditional commutation.(10) The period of time the department is authorized to supervise an individual under this section may be reduced by the earned award of supervision compliance credit pursuant to RCW 9.94A.717.Sec. 7. RCW 72.09.270 and 2024 c 315 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department of corrections shall develop an individual reentry plan as defined in RCW 72.09.015 for every incarcerated individual who is committed to the jurisdiction of the department except:(a) Incarcerated individuals who are sentenced to life without the possibility of release or sentenced to death under chapter 10.95 RCW; and(b) Incarcerated individuals who are subject to the provisions of 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1227.(2) The individual reentry plan may be one document, or may be a series of individual plans that combine to meet the requirements of this section.(3) In developing individual reentry plans, the department shall assess all incarcerated individuals using standardized and comprehensive tools to identify the criminogenic risks, programmatic needs, and educational and vocational skill levels for each incarcerated individual. The assessment tool should take into account demographic biases, such as culture, age, and gender, as well as the needs of the incarcerated individual, including any learning disabilities, substance abuse or mental health issues, and social or behavior challenges.(4)(a) The initial assessment shall be conducted as early as sentencing, but, whenever possible, no later than ((forty--five))45 days of being sentenced to the jurisdiction of the department of corrections.(b) The incarcerated individual's individual reentry plan shall be developed as soon as possible after the initial assessment is conducted, but, whenever possible, no later than ((sixty))60 days after completion of the assessment, and shall be periodically reviewed and updated as appropriate.(5) The individual reentry plan shall, at a minimum, include:(a) A plan to maintain contact with the incarcerated individual's children and family, if appropriate. The plan should determine whether parenting classes, or other services, are appropriate to facilitate successful reunification with the incarcerated individual's children and family;(b) An individualized portfolio for each incarcerated individual that includes the incarcerated individual's education achievements, certifications, employment, work experience, skills, and any training received prior to and during incarceration; and(c) A plan for the incarcerated individual during the period of incarceration through reentry into the community that addresses the needs of the incarcerated individual including education, employment, substance abuse treatment, mental health treatment, family reunification, and other areas which are needed to facilitate a successful reintegration into the community. For any individual committed to the jurisdiction of the department for a sex offense or failure to register offense, the department shall utilize existing resources and methods to support compliance and improve functioning in the community.(6)(a) Prior to discharge of any incarcerated individual, the department shall:(i) Evaluate the incarcerated individual's needs and, to the extent possible, connect the incarcerated individual with existing services and resources that meet those needs;(ii) Connect the incarcerated individual with a community justice center and/or community transition coordination network in the area in which the incarcerated individual will be residing once released from the correctional system if one exists; and(iii) Ensure that every consenting incarcerated individual confined in a department of corrections facility for 60 days or longer possesses a valid identicard or driver's license, issued by the department of licensing under chapter 46.20 RCW, prior to the individual's release to the community. Issuance of the identicard or driver's license must not cause a delay in the incarcerated individual's release to the community or transfer to partial confinement. The department must:(A) Pay any application fee required for obtaining the identicard;(B) Provide a photo of the incarcerated individual for use on the identicard under RCW 46.20.035(1), which upon request of the individual must be a different photo than the individual's mug shot and not indicate that the individual was incarcerated at the time of the photo; and(C) Obtain a signature from the individual that is acceptable to the department of licensing to use for an identicard or driver's license.(b) If the department recommends partial confinement in an incarcerated individual's individual reentry plan, the department shall maximize the period of partial confinement for the incarcerated individual as allowed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728 to facilitate the incarcerated individual's transition to the community.(7) The department shall establish mechanisms for sharing information from individual reentry plans to those persons involved with the incarcerated individual's treatment, programming, and reentry, when deemed appropriate. When feasible, this information shall be shared electronically.(8)(a) In determining the county of discharge for an incarcerated individual released to community custody, the department may approve a residence location that is not in the incarcerated individual's county of origin if the department determines that the residence location would be appropriate based on any court-ordered condition of the incarcerated individual's sentence, victim safety concerns, and factors that increase opportunities for successful reentry and long-term support including, but not limited to, location of family or other sponsoring persons or organizations that will support the incarcerated individual, ability to complete an educational program that the incarcerated individual is enrolled in, availability of appropriate programming or treatment, and access to housing, employment, and prosocial influences on the person in the community.(b) In implementing the provisions of this subsection, the department shall approve residence locations in a manner that will not cause any one county to be disproportionately impacted.(c) If the incarcerated individual is not returned to his or her county of origin, the department shall provide the law and justice council of the county in which the incarcerated individual is placed with a written explanation.(d)(i) For purposes of this section, except as provided in (d)(ii) of this subsection, the incarcerated individual's county of origin means the county of the incarcerated individual's residence at the time of the incarcerated individual's first felony conviction in Washington state.(ii) If the incarcerated individual is a homeless person as defined in RCW 43.185C.010, or the incarcerated individual's residence is unknown, then the incarcerated individual's county of origin means the county of the incarcerated individual's first felony conviction in Washington state.(9) Nothing in this section creates a vested right in programming, education, or other services.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. (1) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs must review the model policy developed under RCW 4.24.5501, and the model policy for Washington law enforcement regarding adult and juvenile sex offender registration and community notification, to identify opportunities to utilize technology and streamline initial and ongoing registration processes, including options for remote registration.(2) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs must report its findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the sex offender policy board no later than December 1, 2026, and update the model policy as needed no later than June 1, 2027.--- END ---